Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.52.095

Vehicle prowling in the first degree.

(1) A person is guilty of vehicle prowling in the first degree if, with intent to commit a crime against a person or property therein, he or she enters or remains unlawfully in a motor home, as defined in RCW 46.04.305, or in a vessel equipped for propulsion by mechanical means or by sail which has a cabin equipped with permanently installed sleeping quarters or cooking facilities.

(2) Vehicle prowling in the first degree is a class C felony.

[ 2011 c 336 s 375; 1982 1st ex.s. c 47 s 13.]

NOTES:

Severability—1982 1st ex.s. c 47: See note following RCW 9.41.190.